Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-7432
Chain pharmacy warehouse, defined.

Chain pharmacy warehouse means a facility utilized as a central warehouse for intracompany sales or transfers of prescription drugs or devices by two or more pharmacies operating under common ownership or common control.

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 6.